Utah statutes.
31A-22-901.   Laws applicable to contracts of fraternal insurers.

Except as otherwise provided under this part, or in Chapter 9, insurance contracts issued by fraternal insurers are subject to the contract provisions of the Insurance Code in the same manner as contracts issued by any other insurer.

